Oklahoma, session 2026, SB902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.4, as


amended by Section 7, Chapter 318, O.S.L. 2022 (22 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 60.4), is amended to read as follows:


Section 60.4. A. 1. A copy of a petition for a protective


order, any notice of hearing and a copy of any emergency temporary


order or emergency ex parte order issued by the court shall be


served upon the defendant in the same manner as a bench warrant. In


addition, if the service is to be in another county, the court clerk


may issue service to the sheriff by facsimile or other electronic


transmission for service by the sheriff and receive the return of

Req. No. 1218 Page 1


service from the sheriff in the same manner. Any fee for service of


a petition for protective order, notice of hearing, and emergency ex


parte order shall only be charged pursuant to subsection C of


Section 60.2 of this title and, if charged, shall be the same as the


sheriff’s service fee plus mileage expenses.


2. Emergency temporary orders, emergency ex parte orders and


notice of hearings shall be given priority for service and can be


served twenty-four (24) hours a day when the location of the


defendant is known. When service cannot be made upon the defendant


by the sheriff, the sheriff may contact another law enforcement


officer or a private investigator or private process server to serve


the defendant.


3. An emergency temporary order, emergency ex parte order, a


petition for protective order, and a notice of hearing shall have


statewide validity and may be transferred to any law enforcement


jurisdiction to effect service upon the defendant. The sheriff may


transmit the document by electronic means.


4. The return of service shall be submitted to the sheriff’s


office or court clerk in the court where the petition, notice of


hearing or order was issued.


5. When the defendant is a minor child who is ordered removed


from the residence of the victim, in addition to those documents


served upon the defendant, a copy of the petition, notice of hearing


and a copy of any temporary order or ex parte order issued by the

Req. No. 1218 Page 2


court shall be delivered with the child to the caretaker of the


place where such child is taken pursuant to Section 2-2-101 of Title


10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. 1. Within fourteen (14) days of the filing of the petition


for a protective order, the court shall schedule a full hearing on


the petition, if the court finds sufficient grounds within the scope


of the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act stated in the petition to


hold such a hearing, regardless of whether an emergency temporary


order or ex parte order has been previously issued, requested or


denied. Provided, however, when the defendant is a minor child who


has been removed from the residence pursuant to Section 2-2-101 of


Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, the court shall schedule a full


hearing on the petition within seventy-two (72) hours, regardless of


whether an emergency temporary order or ex parte order has been


previously issued, requested or denied.


2. The court may schedule a full hearing on the petition for a


protective order within seventy-two (72) hours when the court issues


an emergency temporary order or ex parte order suspending child


visitation rights due to physical violence or threat of abuse.


3. If service has not been made on the defendant at the time of


the hearing, the court shall, at the request of the petitioner,


issue a new emergency order reflecting a new hearing date and direct


service to issue.



Req. No. 1218 Page 3


4. A petition for a protective order shall, upon the request of


the petitioner, renew every fourteen (14) days with a new hearing


date assigned until the defendant is served. A petition for a


protective order shall not expire unless the petitioner fails to


appear at the hearing or fails to request a new order. A petitioner


may move to dismiss the petition and emergency or final order at any


time; however, a protective order must be dismissed by court order.


5. Failure to serve the defendant shall not be grounds for


dismissal of a petition or an ex parte order unless the victim


requests dismissal or fails to appear for the hearing thereon.


6. A final protective order shall be granted or denied within


six (6) months of service on the defendant unless all parties agree


that a temporary protective order remain in effect; provided, a


victim shall have the right to request a final protective order


hearing at any time after the passage of six (6) months.


C. 1. At the hearing, the court may impose any terms and


conditions in the protective order that the court reasonably


believes are necessary to bring about the cessation of domestic


abuse against the victim or stalking or harassment of the victim or


the immediate family of the victim but shall not impose any term and


condition that may compromise the safety of the victim including,


but not limited to, mediation, couples counseling, family


counseling, parenting classes or joint victim-offender counseling


sessions. The court may order the defendant to obtain domestic

Req. No. 1218 Page 4


abuse counseling or treatment in a program certified by the Attorney


General at the expense of the defendant pursuant to Section 644 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. If the court grants a protective order and the defendant is


a minor child, the court shall order a preliminary inquiry in a


juvenile proceeding to determine whether further court action


pursuant to the Oklahoma Juvenile Code should be taken against a


juvenile defendant.


D. Final protective orders authorized by this section shall be


on a standard form developed by the Administrative Office of the


Courts.


E. 1. After notice and hearing, protective orders authorized


by this section may require the defendant to undergo treatment or


participate in the court-approved counseling services necessary to


bring about cessation of domestic abuse against the victim pursuant


to Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes but shall not


order any treatment or counseling that may compromise the safety of


the victim including, but not limited to, mediation, couples


counseling, family counseling, parenting classes or joint victim-


offender counseling sessions.


2. The defendant may be required to pay all or any part of the


cost of such treatment or counseling services. The court shall not


be responsible for such cost.



Req. No. 1218 Page 5


3. Should the plaintiff choose to undergo treatment or


participate in court-approved counseling services for victims of


domestic abuse, the court may order the defendant to pay all or any


part of the cost of such treatment or counseling services if the


court determines that payment by the defendant is appropriate.


F. When necessary to protect the victim and when authorized by


the court, protective orders granted pursuant to the provisions of


this section may be served upon the defendant by a peace officer,


sheriff, constable, or policeman or other officer whose duty it is


to preserve the peace, as defined by Section 99 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


G. 1. Any protective order issued on or after November 1,


2012, pursuant to subsection C of this section shall be:


a. for a fixed period not to exceed a period of five (5)


years unless extended, modified, vacated or rescinded


upon motion by either party or if the court approves


any consent agreement entered into by the plaintiff


and defendant; provided, if the defendant is


incarcerated, the protective order shall remain in


full force and effect during the period of


incarceration. The period of incarceration, in any


jurisdiction, shall not be included in the calculation


of the five-year time limitation, or



Req. No. 1218 Page 6


b. continuous upon a specific finding by the court of one


of the following:


(1) the person has a history of violating the orders


of any court or governmental entity,


(2) the person has previously been convicted of a


violent felony offense,


(3) the person has a previous felony conviction for


stalking as provided in Section 1173 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


(4) a court order for a final Victim Protection Order


has previously been issued against the person in


this state or another state, or


(5) the victim provides proof that a continuous


protective order is necessary for his or her


protection.


Further, the court may take into consideration whether the person


has a history of domestic violence or a history of other violent


acts. The protective order shall remain in effect until modified,


vacated or rescinded upon motion by either party or if the court


approves any consent agreement entered into by the plaintiff and


defendant. If the defendant is incarcerated, the protective order


shall remain in full force and effect during the period of


incarceration.



Req. No. 1218 Page 7


2. The court shall notify the parties at the time of the


issuance of the protective order of the duration of the protective


order.


3. Upon the filing of a motion by either party to modify,


extend, or vacate a protective order, a hearing shall be scheduled


and notice given to the parties. At the hearing, the issuing court


may take such action as is necessary under the circumstances.


4. If a child has been removed from the residence of a parent


or custodial adult because of domestic abuse committed by the child,


the parent or custodial adult may refuse the return of such child to


the residence unless, upon further consideration by the court in a


juvenile proceeding, it is determined that the child is no longer a


threat and should be allowed to return to the residence.


H. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and


willfully seek a protective order against a spouse or ex-spouse


pursuant to the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act for purposes of


harassment, undue advantage, intimidation, or limitation of child


visitation rights in any divorce proceeding or separation action


without justifiable cause.


2. The violator shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a


period not exceeding one (1) year or by a fine not to exceed Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.



Req. No. 1218 Page 8


3. A second or subsequent conviction under this subsection


shall be a felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the


Department of Corrections for a period not to exceed two (2) years,


or by a fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by


both such fine and imprisonment.


I. 1. A protective order issued under the Protection from


Domestic Abuse Act shall not in any manner affect title to real


property, purport to grant to the parties a divorce or otherwise


purport to determine the issues between the parties as to child


custody, visitation or visitation schedules, child support or


division of property or any other like relief obtainable pursuant to


Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except child visitation orders


may be temporarily suspended or modified to protect from threats of


abuse or physical violence by the defendant or a threat to violate a


custody order. Orders not affecting title may be entered for good


cause found to protect an animal owned by either of the parties or


any child living in the household.


2. When granting any protective order for the protection of a


minor child from violence or threats of abuse, the court shall allow


visitation only under conditions that provide adequate supervision


and protection to the child while maintaining the integrity of a


divorce decree or temporary order.


J. 1. In order to ensure that a petitioner can maintain an


existing wireless telephone number or household utility account, the

Req. No. 1218 Page 9


court, after providing notice and a hearing, may issue an order


directing a wireless service provider or public utility provider to


transfer the billing responsibility for and rights to the wireless


telephone number or numbers of any minor children in the care of the


petitioning party or household utility account to the petitioner if


the petitioner is not the wireless service or public utility account


holder.


2. The order transferring billing responsibility for and rights


to the wireless telephone number or numbers or household utility


account to the petitioner shall list the name and billing telephone


number of the account holder, the name and contact information of


the person to whom the telephone number or numbers or household


utility account will be transferred and each telephone number or


household utility to be transferred to that person. The court shall


ensure that the contact information of the petitioner is not


provided to the account holder in proceedings held under this


subsection.


3. Upon issuance, a copy of the final order of protection shall


be transmitted, either electronically or by certified mail, to the


registered agent of the wireless service provider or public utility


provider listed with the Secretary of State or Corporation


Commission of Oklahoma or electronically to the email address


provided by the wireless service provider or public utility



Req. No. 1218 Page 10


provider. Such transmittal shall constitute adequate notice for the


wireless service provider or public utility provider.


4. If the wireless service provider or public utility provider


cannot operationally or technically effectuate the order due to


certain circumstances, the wireless service provider or public


utility provider shall notify the petitioner. Such circumstances


shall include, but not be limited to, the following:


a. the account holder has already terminated the account,


b. the differences in network technology prevent the


functionality of a mobile device on the network, or


c. there are geographic or other limitations on network


or service availability.


5. Upon transfer of billing responsibility for and rights to a


wireless telephone number or numbers or household utility account to


the petitioner under the provisions of this subsection by a wireless


service provider or public utility provider, the petitioner shall


assume all financial responsibility for the transferred wireless


telephone number or numbers or household utility account, monthly


service and utility billing costs and costs for any mobile device


associated with the wireless telephone number or numbers. The


wireless service provider or public utility provider shall have the


right to pursue the original account holder for purposes of


collecting any past due amounts owed to the wireless service


provider or public utility provider.

Req. No. 1218 Page 11


6. The provisions of this subsection shall not preclude a


wireless service provider or public utility provider from applying


any routine and customary requirements for account establishment to


the petitioner as part of this transfer of billing responsibility


for a household utility account or for a wireless telephone number


or numbers and any mobile devices attached to that number including,


but not limited to, identification, financial information and


customer preferences.


7. The provisions of this subsection shall not affect the


ability of the court to apportion the assets and debts of the


parties as provided for in law or the ability to determine the


temporary use, possession and control of personal property.


8. No cause of action shall lie against any wireless service


provider or public utility provider, its officers, employees or


agents for actions taken in accordance with the terms of a court


order issued under the provisions of this subsection.


9. As used in this subsection:


a. “wireless service provider” means a provider of


commercial mobile service under Section 332(d) of the


federal Telecommunications Act of 1996,


b. “public utility provider” means every corporation


organized or doing business in this state that owns,


operates or manages any plant or equipment for the


manufacture, production, transmission, transportation,

Req. No. 1218 Page 12


delivery or furnishing of water, heat or light with


gas or electric current for heat, light or power, for


public use in this state, and


c. “household utility account” shall include utility


services for water, heat, light, power or gas that are


provided by a public utility provider.


K. 1. A court shall not issue any mutual protective orders.


2. If both parties allege domestic abuse by the other party,


the parties shall do so by separate petitions. The court shall


review each petition separately in an individual or a consolidated


hearing and grant or deny each petition on its individual merits.


If the court finds cause to grant both motions, the court shall do


so by separate orders and with specific findings justifying the


issuance of each order.


3. The court may only consolidate a hearing if:


a. the court makes specific findings that:


(1) sufficient evidence exists of domestic abuse,


stalking, harassment or rape against each party,


and


(2) each party acted primarily as aggressors,


b. the defendant filed a petition with the court for a


protective order no less than three (3) days, not


including weekends or holidays, prior to the first



Req. No. 1218 Page 13


scheduled full hearing on the petition filed by the


plaintiff, and


c. the defendant had no less than forty-eight (48) hours


of notice prior to the full hearing on the petition


filed by the plaintiff.


L. The court may allow a plaintiff or victim to be accompanied


by a victim support person at court proceedings. A victim support


person shall not make legal arguments; however, a victim support


person who is not a licensed attorney may offer the plaintiff or


victim comfort or support and may remain in close proximity to the


plaintiff or victim.


M. 1. If a plaintiff files a motion requesting a protective


order be vacated or dismissed, the plaintiff shall present to the


court a safety plan specific to the plaintiff. The safety plan


shall not be made part of the record of the court and shall not be


shared with the defendant in the matter.


2. The safety plan shall contain the following information:


a. code words the plaintiff can use to covertly alert a


designated person that the plaintiff needs assistance,


b. a list of individuals the plaintiff can contact for


support or assistance in places the plaintiff


frequently visits,


c. a safe place the plaintiff can go to other than the


plaintiff’s home,

Req. No. 1218 Page 14


d. a list of individuals the plaintiff can share his or


her location with if necessary,


e. strategies to avoid contact with the defendant if


necessary,


f. a list of items the plaintiff will need if he or she


is forced to leave his or her residence unexpectedly,


g. the contact information for a domestic violence


shelter or organization that can assist the plaintiff


in an emergency, and


h. any other information the plaintiff may believe is


necessary.


3. Upon review of the safety plan, the court may vacate or


dismiss the protective order.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1218 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:38 AM

















Req. No. 1218 Page 15